tr: Lastik hamur tipi: Kuru; Sert; Ara; Orta; Yağmur; Slick; Yumuşak; Süper sert; Süper yumuşak; Islak; Diğer
da: Type af dækgummiblanding: Tør; Hård; Mellem; Medium; Regn; Slick; Blød; Superhård; Superblød; Våd; Andet
ko: 타이어 컴파운드 유형: 건식; 하드; 인터미디어트; 미디엄; 우천용; 슬릭; 소프트; 슈퍼 하드; 슈퍼 소프트; 습식; 기타
de: Art der Reifenmischung: Trocken; Hart; Intermediate; Medium; Regen; Slick; Weich; Superhart; Superweich; Nass; Sonstige
it: Tipo di mescola dello pneumatico: Da asciutto; Dura; Intermedia; Media; Da pioggia; Slick; Morbida; Super dura; Super morbida; Da bagnato; Altro
pt-BR: Tipo de composto do pneu: Seco; Duro; Intermediário; Médio; Chuva; Slick; Macio; Superduro; Supermacio; Molhado; Outros
th: ประเภทของส่วนผสมยาง: แห้ง; แข็ง; ปานกลาง; ปานกลาง; ฝน; สลิก; นุ่ม; แข็งมาก; นุ่มมาก; เปียก; อื่นๆ
vi: Loại hợp chất lốp: Khô; Cứng; Trung bình; Vừa; Mưa; Trơn; Mềm; Siêu cứng; Siêu mềm; Ướt; Khác
sv: Typ av gummiblandning för däck: Torrt; Hård; Mellan; Medium; Regn; Slick; Mjuk; Superhård; Supermjuk; Våt; Övrigt
ru: Тип резиновой смеси шины: Для сухой трассы; Жёсткий; Промежуточный; Средний; Дождевой; Слик; Мягкий; Супержёсткий; Супермягкий; Для мокрой трассы; Другое
hr-HR: Vrsta smjese gume: Suha; Tvrda; Intermedijarna; Srednja; Za kišu; Glatko (slick); Meko; Iznimno tvrdo; Iznimno meko; Za mokro; Ostalo
lt-LT: Padangų mišinio tipas: Sausai dangai; Kieto mišinio; Tarpinis; Vidutinio kietumo; Lietaus; Glotnusis; Minkštasis; Ypač kietas; Ypač minkštas; Šlapiai dangai; Kita
ja: タイヤコンパウンドタイプ: ドライ; ハード; インターミディエイト; ミディアム; レイン; スリック; ソフト; スーパーハード; スーパーソフト; ウェット; その他
ro-RO: Tip de compus al anvelopei: Uscat; Dur; Intermediar; Mediu; Ploaie; Slick; Moale; Super dur; Super moale; Umed; Altele
pl: Typ mieszanki opony: Na suchą nawierzchnię; Twarda; Przejściowa; Średnia; Deszczowa; Slick; Miękka; Bardzo twarda; Bardzo miękka; Na mokrą nawierzchnię; Inna
fr: Type de gomme: Sec; Dur; Intermédiaire; Moyen; Pluie; Slick; Tendre; Super dur; Super tendre; Mouillé; Autre
fi: Renkaan seostyyppi: Kuiva; Kova; Välikeli; Keskikova; Sade; Slicks; Pehmeä; Erittäin kova; Erittäin pehmeä; Märkä; Muu
el: Τύπος γόμας ελαστικού: Στεγνό; Σκληρό; Ενδιάμεσο; Μεσαίο; Βροχής; Slick; Μαλακό; Πολύ σκληρό; Πολύ μαλακό; Βρεγμένο; Άλλο
cs: Typ směsi pneumatiky: Do sucha; Tvrdá; Přechodná; Střední; Do deště; Slick; Měkká; Super tvrdá; Super měkká; Na mokro; Jiné
es: Tipo de compuesto del neumático: Seco; Duro; Intermedio; Medio; Lluvia; Slick; Blando; Súper duro; Súper blando; Mojado; Otro
en: Tire compound type: Dry; Hard; Intermediate; Medium; Rain; Slick; Soft; Super hard; Super soft; Wet; Other
pt-PT: Tipo de composto do pneu: Seco; Duro; Intermédio; Médio; Chuva; Liso; Macio; Superduro; Supermacio; Molhado; Outro
nl: Rubbersamenstelling band: Droog; Hard; Intermediate; Medium; Regen; Slick; Zacht; Superhard; Superzacht; Nat; Overige
nb: Type dekkmateriale: Tørr; Hard; Intermediate; Medium; Regn; Slicks; Myk; Superhard; Supermyk; Våt; Annet
zh-TW: 輪胎膠料類型: 乾地; 硬; 半雨胎/中性; 中等; 雨天; 光頭胎; 軟; 超硬; 超軟; 濕地; 其他
zh-CN: 轮胎胶料类型: 干地; 硬胎; 半雨胎; 中性胎; 雨胎; 光头胎; 软胎; 超硬胎; 超软胎; 湿地; 其他
hu: Gumiabroncs keverék típusa: Száraz; Kemény; Köztes; Közepes; Eső; Slick; Lágy; Szuperkemény; Szuperlágy; Nedves; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrsta zmesi pnevmatike: Za suho podlago; Trda zmes; Vmesna zmes; Srednja zmes; Dežna; Slick; Mehka; Zelo trda; Zelo mehka; Za mokro cestišče; Drugo
bg-BG: Тип каучукова смес на гумата: Суха; Твърда; Междинна; Средна; За дъжд; Слик; Мека; Супер твърда; Супер мека; За мокра настилка; Друго
sk-SK: Typ zmesi do pneumatiky: Suchá; Tvrdá; Prechodná; Stredná; Dažďová; Slick; Mäkká; Super tvrdá; Super mäkká; Mokrá; Iné